2018-komp-ling/practicals/Finite-state Morphology/chv.lexc.txt
Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>                ! Имя существительное
%<pl%>               ! Множественное число
%<nom%>              ! Именительный падеж
%<ins%>              ! Творительный падеж
%<gen%>              ! Дательный падеж
%{A%}                ! Архифонема [а] или [е]
%{Ă%}                ! Архифонема [а] или [е]
%>                   ! Граница морфемы
%{м%}                ! Родительный archiphoneme
%<der_лӑх%>          !производный суффикс
%{ъ%}                   

LEXICON Root

Nouns ;

LEXICON CASES 

%<nom%>:%> # ;
%<ins%>:%>п%{A%} # ;
%<gen%>:%>%{Ă%}н # ;

LEXICON PLURAL
                 CASES ;
%<pl%>:%>се%{м%} CASES ;


LEXICON SUBST 
CASES ;
PLURAL ;

LEXICON DER-N

%<der_лӑх%>:%>л%{Ă%}х SUBST "weight: 1.0" ; 

LEXICON N

%<n%>: PLURAL ;
%<n%>: SUBST ;
%<n%>: DER-N ;

LEXICON Nouns

урам:урам N ;     ! "улица"
пакча:пакча N ;   ! "сад"
хула:хула N ;     ! "город"
канаш:канаш N ;   ! "совет"
тӗс:тӗс N ;       ! "вид"
патша:патша N ;   ! "царь"
куҫ:куҫ N ;       ! "глаз"
патшалӑх:патшалӑх N ; ! "государство"
специалист:специалист%{ъ%} N ; ! "специалист"
